Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1808
Violations; penalty.

Any person violating any provision of sections 54-1801 to 54-1808 shall be guilty of a Class IV felony and shall be liable in double damages to any party injured thereby.

Laws 1969, c. 448, § 8, p. 1501;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 47.